Illinois, session 104th, SB2564.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 8ordinary and contingent expenses of the Illinois Criminal 9Justice Information Authority:10OPERATIONS11Payable from General Revenue Fund:12  For Personal Services.............................4,256,90013  For State Contributions to Social Security..........325,60014  For Contractual Services............................878,80015  For Travel............................................7,00016  For Commodities.........................................50017  For Printing..........................................1,50018For Equipment..........................................74,20019  For Electronic Data Processing......................452,40020  For Telecommunication Services......................132,70021  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................2,00022    Total                                          $6,131,600   SB2564- 2 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1    Section 10. The amount of $525,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 3Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 4for the Illinois Family Violence Coordinating Council Program. 5    Section 15. The amount of $700,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 8for all costs associated with Bullying Prevention. 9    Section 20. The amount of $259,900, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 12for all costs associated with technical assistance and 13navigation of the Grant Accountability and Transparency Act. 14    Section 25. The amount of $13,000,000, or so much thereof 15as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Criminal 16Justice Information Authority from the General Revenue Fund 17for administrative costs, awards and grants for Adult Redeploy 18and Diversion Programs. 19    Section 30. The amount of $3,000,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 22for the purpose of awarding grants, contracts, administrative   SB2564- 3 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1expenses and all related costs for the Safe From the Start 2Program. 3    Section 35. The amount of $16,342,700, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 5Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 6for administrative costs, awards and grants for 7Community-Based Violence Prevention Programs, including prior 8years' costs. 9    Section 40. The amount of $6,694,300, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 12for grants and administrative expenses related to Metropolitan 13Family Services' support of street intervention programming. 14    Section 45. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 15as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 17for a grant to the Safer Foundation for violence prevention 18services and any associated administrative expenses. 19    Section 50. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 22for grants to local law enforcement agencies, other first   SB2564- 4 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1responders, and co-responders for training and other allowable 2costs pursuant to the Community Partnership for Deflection and 3Addiction Treatment Act and any associated administrative 4expenses. 5    Section 55. The amount of $623,700, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 8for costs associated with implementation of the Pretrial 9Fairness Act. 10    Section 60. The amount of $1,500,000, or so much thereof 11as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 12Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 13for grants and administrative expenses associated with 14statewide deferred prosecution funding programs. 15    Section 65. The amount of $350,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 17Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 18for grants and administrative expenses associated with the Ad 19Hoc Statewide Domestic Violence Fatality Review Committee. 20    Section 70. The amount of $566,600, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 22Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority   SB2564- 5 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1for grants and administrative expenses associated with the 2Institute 2 Innovate. 3    Section 75. The amount of $3,176,200, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 5Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 6for grants and administrative expenses related to trauma 7recovery centers. 8    Section 80. The amount of $5,000,000, or so much thereof 9as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 10Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 11for grants to local law enforcement agencies related to less 12lethal devices, less lethal device training, and other 13allowable costs associated with less lethal weapon 14alternatives, and any associated administrative expenses. 15    Section 83. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much thereof 16as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 17Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 18for grants to local law enforcement agencies, other first 19responders, and co-responders for the co-responder pilot 20program, and any associated administrative expenses. 21    Section 85. The amount of $15,000,000, or so much thereof 22as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue   SB2564- 6 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 2for administrative costs and grants for community-based 3violence prevention programs to the following named entities. 4The combined cost of grants and administrative expenses 5associated with each grant shall equal the approximate amounts 6below. 7    Section 90. The sum of $6,700,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 10for the purpose of awarding grants, contracts, administrative 11expenses and all related costs. 12    Section 95. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 14fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 15for a grant to the Center for Housing and Health to be used for 16investment in the Flexible Housing Pool associated with 17transitional and permanent supportive housing for returning 18residents and any associated administrative expenses. 19    Section 100. The sum of $1,000,000 or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 22for cost associated with the InfoNet System.   SB2564- 7 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1    Section 105. The sum of $100,000 or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 3the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority for cost 4associated with the Community-Based Corrections Task Force. 5    Section 110.The sum of $1,276,100, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 8for costs associated with activities in support of federal 9assistance programs administered by state and local 10governments and nonprofit organizations. 11    Section 115. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 13Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 14for grants, contracts, administrative expenses, and all other 15costs related to statewide capacity building. 16ARTICLE 217    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated for the 19objects and purposes named, to meet the ordinary and 20contingent expenses of the Illinois Criminal Justice 21Information Authority:22Payable from the ICJIA Violence Prevention Fund:  SB2564- 8 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1  For Personal Services...............................230,2002  For State Contributions to State3   Employees' Retirement System.......................123,0004  For State Contribution to Social Security............17,7005  For Group Insurance.................................103,5006  For Contractual Services..............................9,5007  For Travel............................................6,0008  For Commodities.......................................2,0009  For Electronic Data Processing.......................19,30010  For Telecommunication Services.......................25,00011    Total                                            $536,200 12    Section 10. The amount of $94,700, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the ICJIA Violence 14Prevention Special Projects Fund to the Illinois Criminal 15Justice Information Authority for administrative costs, awards 16and grants for Adult Redeploy and Diversion Programs. 17    Section 15. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal Justice 19Information Projects Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice 20Information Authority for distribution to fund Department of 21State Police drug task forces and Metropolitan Enforcement 22Groups. 23    Section 20. The amount of $2,500,000, or so much thereof   SB2564- 9 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal Justice 2Information Projects Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice 3Information Authority for distribution of revenue pursuant to 4Section 21.10 of the Illinois Lottery Law. 5    Section 25. The amount of $180,000,000, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal Justice 7Information Projects Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice 8Information Authority for administrative costs, awards and 9grants associated with the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew 10Program, including prior years' costs. 11    Section 30. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal Justice 13Information Projects Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice 14Information Authority for all costs associated with research, 15analysis and evaluation of Restore, Reinvest, and Renew 16programs. 17    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 18thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois 19Criminal Justice Information Authority for awards and grants 20and other monies received from federal agencies, from other 21units of government, and from private/not-for-profit 22organizations for activities undertaken in support of 23investigating issues in criminal justice and for undertaking   SB2564- 10 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1other criminal justice information projects:2Payable from the Criminal Justice 3 Trust Fund.........................................1,700,0004Payable from the Criminal Justice 5 Information Projects Fund..........................1,215,3006    Total                                          $2,915,300 7    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much 8thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois 9Criminal Justice Information Authority for activities 10undertaken in support of federal assistance programs 11administered by units of state and local government and 12non-profit organizations:13Payable from the Criminal Justice 14 Trust Fund.........................................7,000,000 15    Section 45. The amount of $4,000,000, or so much thereof 16as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal Justice 17Trust Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 18Authority for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 19    Section 50. The amount of $140,000,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Criminal Justice 21Trust Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 22Authority for awards and grants to local units of government, 23state agencies and non-profit organizations.   SB2564- 11 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1    Section 60. The following named amounts, or so much 2thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 3purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Illinois 4Criminal Justice Information Authority for the training of law 5enforcement personnel and services for families of victims of 6homicide or murder:7Payable from the Death Penalty Abolition Fund:8  For operational expenses............................874,3009  For Awards and Grants to Local Units of10   Government, State Agencies and Non-Profit11   Organizations for Training of Law12   Enforcement Personnel and Services13   for Families of Victims of14   Homicide or Murder...............................4,000,00015    Total                                          $4,874,300 16    Section 65. The amount of $20,000,000, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Violent Crime 18Witness Protection Program Fund to the Illinois Criminal 19Justice Information Authority for grants and administrative 20expenses associated with the Violent Crime Witness Protection 21Act and the Crime Reduction Task Force Act. 22    Section 70. The amount of $7,800, or so much thereof as may 23be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois State Crime   SB2564- 12 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1Stoppers Association Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice 2Information Authority for grants to enhance and develop Crime 3Stoppers program in Illinois. 4ARTICLE 35    Section 5. The sum of $6,826,302, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 7on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 8such purposes in Article 130, Section 340 of Public Act 9103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 10Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 11Criminal Justice Information Authority for grants and 12administrative expenses associated with implementing violence 13prevention programs, including but not limited to, for 14purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan 15Act of 2021 and any associated federal guidance, including 16prior years' costs. 17    Section 10. The amount of $360,295, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 19business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore 20made for such purposes in Article 130, Section 345 of Public 21Act 103-0589, as amended, is appropriated from the State 22Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 23Criminal Justice Information Authority for a grant and   SB2564- 13 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1administrative costs to Waukegan School District #60, 2including but not limited to, for purposes permitted by 3Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and 4related federal guidance, including prior years' costs. 5    Section 15. The sum of $800,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 7on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 8such purpose in Article 130, Section 350 of Public Act 9103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 10Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 11Criminal Justice Information Authority for a grant and 12administrative costs to Earhart Elementary School, including 13but not limited to, for purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the 14American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and any associated federal 15guidance, including prior years' costs. 16    Section 20. The sum of $260,300, or so much thereof as may 17be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 18on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore made for 19such purposes in Article 130, Section 355 of Public Act 20103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 21Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 22Criminal Justice Information Authority for a grant and 23administrative costs to Dulles Elementary School, including 24but not limited to, for purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the   SB2564- 14 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and any associated federal 2guidance, including prior years' costs. 3    Section 25. The sum of $216,490, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 5on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore made for 6such purposes in Article 130, Section 360 of Public Act 7103-0589, as amended is reappropriated from the State 8Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 9Criminal Justice Information Authority for a grant and 10administrative costs to St. Bernard Hospital, including but 11not limited to, for purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the 12American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and any associated federal 13guidance, including prior years' costs. 14    Section 30. The amount of $19,570,086, or so much thereof 15as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 16business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore 17made for such purposes in Article 130, Section 370 of Public 18Act 103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 19Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Illinois 20Criminal Justice Information Authority for administrative 21costs and grants to the following named entities, including 22but not limited to, for purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the 23American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and any associated federal 24guidance, including prior years' costs. The combined cost of   SB2564- 15 -OMB104 00082 PRA 10082 b1grants and administrative expenses associated with each grant 2shall equal the approximate amounts below. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 42025.